morph.lexd
PATTERNS
Noun Clitics?
Verb Clitics?
Pronoun
Particle [:<part>]

LEXICON Clitics
ek:+and<conj>

PATTERN Verb
Agreement VerbStem
VerbStem [á:<imp>]

PATTERN VerbStem
Root(1):Root(4) VerbVowels(1): Root(2): VerbVowels(2): Root(3): [:<v>] :VerbVowels(3)

LEXICON VerbVowels(3)
a a <ints>
á e <pass>
a i <hab>
e á <perf>
{eu} {eu} <mid>
{eu} {eu'} <wit>
u í <act>
y o <caus>

PATTERN Agreement
Person Tense
IrregPersonTense

LEXICON Person
alé:<s1o1>
áda:<s1o2>
á{th}i:<s1o3>
iza:<s2o1>
ise:<s2o3>
gy:<s3ao3>
le:<s3io3>
ká:<svc>

LEXICON Tense
:<pres>
ji:<pst>
da:<nearpst>
ti:<fut>
wa:<pot>
zú:<des>

LEXICON IrregPersonTense
á{th}ji:<s1o3><pst>
á{th}idi:<s1o3><fut>
gi:<s3ao3><pst>
iswa:<s2o3><pot> # sometimes

PATTERN Noun
PrefixCases NounStem SuffixCases

PATTERN NounStem
Root(1):Root(4) NounVowels(1): Root(2): NounVowels(2): Root(3): [:<n>] NounVowels(3):NounVowels(4)
VerbStem [el:<part>]

LEXICON NounVowels(4)
á : {e?} <agt>
e y : <pat>
ó a : <ins>

LEXICON PrefixCases
:
e:<away>
á:<toward>

LEXICON SuffixCases
:<nom>
i:<gen>
éd:<loc>

PATTERN Pronoun
[:p1<prn>] Pronouns(2):Pronouns(1)
[:p3i<prn>] Pronouns(3):Pronouns(1)

LEXICON Pronouns(3)
<nom>       di   xow
<nom><away> édi  exow
<gen>       díxi xwi
